dev/bm.adj.dix
<pardef n="stø/e__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edde</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edde</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edd</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edd</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edende</l>    <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="mak/en__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ent</l>       <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nere</l>      <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>neste</l>     <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nest</l>      <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="blø/yte__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>tte</l>       <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tte</l>       <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytende</l>    <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytte</l>      <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytte</l>      <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytt</l>       <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytt</l>       <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="le/ite__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ita</l>       <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ita</l>       <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ita</l>       <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ita</l>       <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itede</l>     <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itede</l>     <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itende</l>    <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itete</l>     <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itete</l>     <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itet</l>      <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itet</l>      <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itte</l>      <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itte</l>      <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itt</l>       <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itt</l>       <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tte</l>       <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tte</l>       <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r>ite<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kvi__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ede</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ede</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ete</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ete</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sen__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ere</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>este</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="akt/re__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>erste</l>     <r>re<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erst</l>      <r>re<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>re<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="dimensjonal">     <i>dimensjonal</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dental">          <i>dental</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="egenkjær">        <i>egenkjær</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gørrlei">         <i>gørrlei</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dybdeskarp">      <i>dybdeskarp</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bronsebrun">      <i>bronsebrun</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="asynkron">        <i>asynkron</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="herrelaus">       <i>herrelaus</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hvileløs">        <i>hvileløs</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bortre">          <i>bort</i><par n="akt/re__adj"/></e>
<e lm="halvsøt">         <i>halvsøt</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bløyte">          <i>blø</i><par n="blø/yte__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dådløs">          <i>dådløs</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="HIV-positiv">     <i>HIV-positiv</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hypernervøs">     <i>hypernervøs</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aktre">           <i>akt</i><par n="akt/re__adj"/></e>
<e lm="daddelløs">       <i>daddelløs</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="heksadesimal">    <i>heksadesimal</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="beregnbar">       <i>beregnbar</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gradual">         <i>gradual</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="halofil">         <i>halofil</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hestgal">         <i>hestgal</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="halvblind">       <i>halvblind</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="halslaus">        <i>halslaus</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="degressiv">       <i>degressiv</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fragil">          <i>fragil</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forsvarsløs">     <i>forsvarsløs</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bakre">           <i>bak</i><par n="akt/re__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fagmilitær">      <i>fagmilitær</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="elitær">          <i>elitær</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="desentral">       <i>desentral</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="glasifluvial">    <i>glasifluvial</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hårløs">          <i>hårløs</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="supernasjonal">   <i>supernasjonal</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="staurfull">       <i>staurfull</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="smakløs">         <i>smakløs</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="spekulativ">      <i>spekulativ</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="unntakslaus">     <i>unntakslaus</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tertial">         <i>tertial</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="solfrisk">        <i>solfrisk</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vonfull">         <i>vonfull</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="skånsellaus">     <i>skånsellaus</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="solbrun">         <i>solbrun</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="skånselsløs">     <i>skånselsløs</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="strabasiøs">      <i>strabasiøs</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="unøytral">        <i>unøytral</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sportsgal">       <i>sportsgal</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tvilløs">         <i>tvilløs</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sjuk">            <i>sjuk</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sprengkald">      <i>sprengkald</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="venneløs">        <i>venneløs</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="støe">            <i>stø</i><par n="stø/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="virkelighetsfjern"><i>virkelighetsfjern</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="uoriginal">       <i>uoriginal</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sjikanøs">        <i>sjikanøs</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="usårbar">         <i>usårbar</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="smellkald">       <i>smellkald</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="klubbløs">        <i>klubbløs</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ljot">            <i>ljot</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kjempevid">       <i>kjempevid</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="polytonal">       <i>polytonal</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="maken">           <i>mak</i><par n="mak/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kløvbar">         <i>kløvbar</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kjed">            <i>kjed</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kvi">             <i>kvi</i><par n="kvi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="leite">           <i>le</i><par n="le/ite__adj"/></e>
<e lm="refunderbar">     <i>refunderbar</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="objektiv">        <i>objektiv</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="overførbar">      <i>overførbar</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="innfallsrik">     <i>innfallsrik</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ryr">             <i>ryr</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="låk">             <i>låk</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rødgul">          <i>rødgul</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="magesur">         <i>magesur</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="midtre">          <i>midt</i><par n="akt/re__adj"/></e>
<e lm="morløs">          <i>morløs</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mørkgrøn">        <i>mørkgrøn</i><par n="sen__adj"/></e>
